Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1427
Person misrepresenting age to obtain tobacco, electronic nicotine delivery systems, or alternative nicotine products; penalty.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of section 28-1419, any person under the age of twenty-one years who obtains cigars, tobacco, cigarettes, cigarette material, electronic nicotine delivery systems, or alternative nicotine products from a licensee by representing that he or she is of the age of twenty-one years or over is guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1919, c. 180, § 8, p. 403;

C.S.1922, § 9856;

C.S.1929, § 28-1030;

R.S.1943, § 28-1029;

Laws 1947, c. 98, § 1, p. 281;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 107;

R.R.S.1943, § 28-1029, (1975);

Laws 2014, LB863, § 20;

Laws 2019, LB149, § 9;

Laws 2019, LB397, § 9;

Laws 2020, LB1064, § 7.